Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1982.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5306.2(a) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5306.2. Uniform 911 surcharge.(a) Surcharge imposed.--Each subscriber or consumer shall pay a surcharge of [$1.65] $1.95 for each 911 communications service or prepaid wireless device for which that subscriber or consumer is billed by a provider or seller as provided for under this chapter. The surcharge shall be collected apart from and in addition to a fee levied by the provider or seller, in whole or in part, for the provision of 911 services. The surcharge shall be subject to the following:(1) The surcharge shall be uniform, competitively 123456789101112131415161718 neutral and in an equal amount for subscribers or consumers of all 911 communications services.(2) Except as provided under section 5307.1 (relating to payment, collection and remittance of surcharge by sellers of prepaid wireless telecommunications service), the surcharge shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in the fund. The Treasurer may retain up to 1% of the remitted surcharge to pay expenses directly related to the cost of collection.(3) No subscriber or consumer shall be required to pay more than one surcharge per number or device.* * *Section 2. Title 35 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5398.1. Termination.This chapter shall expire January 31, 2029.Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the amendment or addition of 35 Pa.C.S. §§ 5306.2(a) and 5398.1.(2) Article I-K of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1982PN2510 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021